District of Columbia statutes.
12-104

Marriage of party.

An action does not abate by the marriage of a party. On application of a party the court may, on such terms and notice as it deems proper, allow and order any amendment in the pleadings and the making of any new or additional parties that the marriage may render necessary or proper.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 12-104.
1973 Ed., § 12-104.